Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3501
Act, how cited.

Sections 76-3501 to 76-3507 shall be known and may be cited as the Radon Resistant New Construction Act.

Laws 2017, LB9, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB130, § 4.